New Jersey, session 222, A4914.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 10 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-278) is amended to read as follows: 10.  As used in sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through C.34:1B-287): "Affordable housing" means housing occupied or restricted to occupancy by households with income no greater than 80 percent of the regional median income, including, but not limited to, housing that is deed restricted as affordable pursuant to the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.). "Authority" means the New Jersey Economic Development Authority established by section 4 of P.L.1974, c.80 (C.34:1B-4). "Board" means the Board of the New Jersey Economic Development Authority, established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1974, c.80 (C.34:1B-4). "Brownfield site" means any real property in this State that is currently vacant or underutilized and on which there has been, or there is suspected to have been, a discharge of a contaminant or on which there is contaminated building material. "Building services" means any cleaning or routine building maintenance work, including, but not limited to, sweeping, vacuuming, floor cleaning, cleaning of rest rooms, collecting refuse or trash, window cleaning, securing, patrolling, or other work in connection with the care or securing of an existing building, including services typically provided by a door-attendant or concierge.  "Building services" shall not include any skilled maintenance work, professional services, or other public work for which a contractor is required to pay the "prevailing wage" as defined in section 2 of P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.26). "Contaminated building material" means components of a structure where abatement or removal of asbestos, or remediation of materials containing hazardous substances defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1976, c.141 (C.58:10-23.11b), is required by applicable federal, state, or local rules or regulations. "Contamination" or "contaminant" means any discharged hazardous substance as defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1976, c.141 (C.58:10-23.11b), hazardous waste as defined pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1976, c.99 (C.13:1E-38), pollutant as defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1977, c.74 (C.58:10A-3), or contaminated building material. "Department" means the Department of Environmental Protection. "Developer" means any person that enters or proposes to enter into a redevelopment agreement with the authority pursuant to the provisions of section 13 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-281). "Director" means the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury. "Equity" means developer-contributed capital that may consist of cash, costs for project feasibility incurred within the 12 months prior to application, property value less any mortgages when the developer owns the project site, and any other investment by the developer in the project that the authority deems acceptable.  Property value shall be an amount equal to the lesser of:  (1) the purchase price, provided the property was purchased pursuant to an arm's length transaction within 12 months of application; or (2) the value as determined by a current appraisal acceptable to the authority.  "Equity" includes federal or local grants and proceeds from the sale of federal or local tax credits, including, but not limited to, any federal tax credits that the redevelopment receives pursuant to section 42 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. s.42) and section 45D of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. s.45D).  "Equity" shall not include State grants or tax credits or proceeds from redevelopment area bonds.  For a residential project utilizing low income tax credits awarded by the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Financing Agency pursuant to section 19 of P.L.2008, c.46 (C.52:27D-321.1), "equity" includes the portion of the developer's fee that is deferred for a minimum of five years. "Government-restricted municipality" means a municipality in this State with a municipal revitalization index distress score of at least 75, that met the criteria for designation as an urban aid municipality in the 2019 State fiscal year, and that, on the effective date of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.), is subject to financial restrictions imposed pursuant to the "Municipal Stabilization and Recovery Act," P.L.2016, c.4 (C.52:27BBBB-1 et seq.), or is restricted in its ability to levy property taxes on property in that municipality as a result of the State of New Jersey owning or controlling property representing at least 25 percent of the total land area of the municipality or as a result of the federal government of the United States owning or controlling at least 50 acres of the total land area of the municipality, which is dedicated as a national natural landmark. "Labor harmony agreement" means an agreement between a business that serves as the owner or operator of a retail establishment or distribution center and one or more labor organizations, which requires, for the duration of the agreement:  that any participating labor organization and its members agree to refrain from picketing, work stoppages, boycotts, or other economic interference against the business and that the business agrees to maintain a neutral posture with respect to efforts of any participating labor organization to represent employees at an establishment or other unit in the retail establishment or distribution center, agrees to permit the labor organization to have access to the employees, and agrees to guarantee to the labor organization the right to obtain recognition as the exclusive collective bargaining representatives of the employees in an establishment or unit at the retail establishment or distribution center by demonstrating to the New Jersey State Board of Mediation, Division of Private Employment Dispute Settlement, or a mutually agreed-upon, neutral third party that a majority of workers in the unit have shown their preference for the labor organization to be their representative by signing authorization cards indicating that preference.  The labor organization or organizations shall be from a list of labor organizations that have requested to be on the list and that the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development has determined represent substantial numbers of retail or distribution center employees in the State. "Licensed site remediation professional" means an individual who is licensed by the Site Remediation Professional Licensing Board pursuant to section 7 of P.L.2009, c.60 (C.58:10C-7) or the department pursuant to section 12 of P.L.2009, c.60 (C.58:10C-12). "Program" means the Brownfields Redevelopment Incentive Program established by section 11 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-279). "Project costs" means all reasonable costs incurred by a developer that are associated with the construction of a residential redevelopment project. "Project financing gap" means the part of the total remediation cost or total project cost, including reasonable and appropriate return on investment, that remains to be financed after all other sources of capital have been accounted for, including, but not limited to, developer contributed capital, which shall not be less than 20 percent of the total remediation cost or total project cost, and investor or financial entity capital or loans for which the developer, after making all good faith efforts to raise additional capital, certifies that additional capital cannot be raised from other sources; provided, however, that for a redevelopment project located in a government-restricted municipality, the developer contributed capital shall not be less than 10 percent of the cost of rehabilitation or construction.  When an applicant is proposing a new project, the project financing gap shall consider the cost of the full project, but the award size shall be based on remediation costs and project costs. Developer contributed capital may consist of cash, deferred development fees, costs for project feasibility incurred within the 12 months prior to application, property value less any mortgages when the developer owns the project site, and any other investment by the developer in the project deemed acceptable by the authority, as provided by regulations promulgated by the authority.  Property value shall be valued at the lesser of either: a. the purchase price, provided the property was purchased pursuant to an arm's length transaction within 12 months of application; or b. the value as determined by a current appraisal. "Qualified incentive tract" means: a. a population census tract having a poverty rate of 20 percent or more; or b. a census tract in which the median family income for the census tract does not exceed 80 percent of the greater of the Statewide median family income or the median family income of the metropolitan statistical area in which the census tract is situated. "Redevelopment agreement" means an agreement between the authority and a developer under which the developer agrees to perform any work or undertaking necessary for the remediation of a brownfield site located at the site of the redevelopment project or the construction of a residential redevelopment project. "Redevelopment project" means a specific remediation project or a residential redevelopment project undertaken, pursuant to the terms of a redevelopment agreement, by a developer within an area of land whereon a brownfield site is located. "Remediated brownfield site" means a former brownfield site whereon remediation was completed. "Remediation" or "remediate" means all necessary actions to investigate and clean up or respond to any known, suspected, or threatened discharge of contaminants, including, as necessary, the preliminary assessment, site investigation, remedial investigation, and remedial action, or any portion thereof, as those terms are defined in section 23 of P.L.1993, c.139 (C.58:10B-1); and hazardous materials abatement; hazardous materials or waste disposal; building and structural remedial activities, including, but not limited to, demolition, asbestos abatement, polychlorinated biphenyl removal, improvement and capping of landfills, contaminated wood or paint removal, or other infrastructure remedial activities, provided, however, "remediation" or "remediate" shall not include the payment of compensation for damage to, or loss of, natural resources. "Remediation costs" means all reasonable costs associated with the remediation of a contaminated site, except any costs incurred in financing the remediation. "Residential redevelopment project" means a predominately multi-family housing development project undertaken, pursuant to the terms of a redevelopment agreement, by a developer on a remediated brownfield site.  A developer of a residential redevelopment project may be the same developer who remediates the brownfield site whereon the new project is located. (cf:  P.L.2024, c.61, s.5) 2.    Section 11 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-279) is amended to read as follows: 11.  The Brownfields Redevelopment Incentive Program is established as a program under the jurisdiction of the New Jersey Economic Development Authority.  The purpose of the program is to compensate developers of redevelopment projects located on brownfield sites for remediation costs or project costs.  To implement this purpose, the authority shall issue tax credits.  The total value of tax credits approved by the authority shall not exceed the limitations set forth in section 98 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-362).  For the purpose of determining the aggregate value of tax credits approved in a fiscal year, a tax credit shall be deemed to have been approved at the time the authority approves an application for an award of a tax credit.  If the authority approves less than the total amount of tax credits authorized pursuant to this section in a fiscal year, the remaining amount, plus any amounts remaining from previous fiscal years, shall be added to the limit of subsequent fiscal years until that amount of tax credits are claimed or allowed.  Any unapproved, uncertified, or recaptured portion of tax credits during any fiscal year may be carried over and reallocated in succeeding years. (cf:  P.L.2020, c.156, s.11) 3.    Section 12 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-280) is amended to read as follows: 12.  a.  A developer seeking a tax credit for a redevelopment project shall submit an application to the authority and the department in a form and manner prescribed in regulations adopted by the authority, in consultation with the department, pursuant to the provisions of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), provided that the authority shall require separate applications for a remediation project and a residential redevelopment project. b.    A redevelopment project that is a remediation project shall be eligible for a tax credit only if the developer demonstrates to the authority and the department at the time of application that: (1)   except as ordered by a government official with jurisdiction over the brownfield site or certified by a licensed site remediation professional to correct or prevent the spread of a health, safety, or other hazard, and as provided in subsection j. of this section, the developer has not commenced any remediation or clean up at the site of the redevelopment project, except for preliminary assessments and investigations, prior to applying for a tax credit pursuant to this section, but intends to remediate the site immediately upon approval of the tax credit; (2)   the redevelopment project is located on a brownfield site; (3)   without the tax credit, the redevelopment project is not economically feasible; (4)   a project financing gap exists for projects located outside of a government-restricted municipality that have a total remediation cost of $5,000,000 or greater; (5)   the developer shall obtain and submit to the authority, before approval by the board, a letter evidencing support for the redevelopment project from the governing body of the municipality in which the redevelopment project is located; and (6)   each worker employed to perform remediation, construction, or building services work at the redevelopment project shall be paid not less than the prevailing wage rate for the worker's craft or trade, as determined by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.).  The prevailing wage requirements shall apply for remediation or construction work through the completion of the redevelopment project, and the prevailing wage requirements shall apply for building services work at the site of the redevelopment project for 10 years following completion of the redevelopment project.  In the event a redevelopment project, or the aggregate of all redevelopment projects approved for an award under the program, constitute a lease of more than 35 percent of a facility, the prevailing wage requirements shall apply to the entire facility. c.     A redevelopment project that received a reimbursement pursuant to sections 34 through 39 of P.L.1997, c.278 (C.58:10B-26 through 58:10B-31) shall not be eligible to apply for a tax credit under the program.  If the authority receives an application and supporting documentation for approval of a reimbursement pursuant to sections 34 through 39 of P.L.1997, c.278 (C.58:10B-26 through 58:10B-31) prior to the effective date of sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through C.34:1B-287), then the authority may consider the application and award a tax credit to a developer, provided that the authority shall take final action on all applications for approval of a reimbursement pursuant to sections 34 through 39 of P.L.1997, c.278 (C.58:10B-26 through 58:10B-31) no later than July 1, 2019.  No applications shall be submitted pursuant to sections 34 through 39 of P.L.1997, c.278 (C.58:10B-26 through 58:10B-31) after the effective date of sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through C.34:1B-287). d. (1) Prior to approval of an application, the authority shall confirm with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, the Department of Environmental Protection, and the Department of the Treasury whether the developer is in substantial good standing with the respective department, or has entered into an agreement with the respective department that includes a practical corrective action plan for the developer.  The authority may also contract with an independent third party to perform a background check on the developer.  The developer shall certify that any contractors or subcontractors that perform work at the redevelopment project: (a) are registered as required by "The Public Works Contractor Registration Act," P.L.1999, c.238 (C.34:11-56.48 et seq.); (b) have not been debarred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development from engaging in or bidding on Public Works Contracts in New Jersey, and (c) possess a tax clearance certificate issued by the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury.  Provided that the developer is in substantial good standing with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, the Department of Environmental Protection, and the Department of the Treasury, or has entered into such an agreement, and following approval of an application by the board, the authority shall enter into a redevelopment agreement with the developer, as provided for in section 13 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-281). (2)   The authority, in consultation with the department, may impose additional requirements upon an applicant through rule or regulation adopted pursuant to the provisions of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), if the authority or the department determines the additional requirements to be necessary and appropriate to effectuate the purposes of sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through C.34:1B-287). e.     The authority, in consultation with the department, shall conduct a review of the applications submitted pursuant to this section on a rolling basis, unless the authority determines that demand is likely to exceed available tax credits, and then through a competitive application process whereby the authority and the department shall evaluate all applications submitted by a date certain, as if all received applications were submitted on that date.  To receive a tax credit award, a developer's application shall meet a minimum score, as determined by the authority.  In addition to the eligibility criteria set forth in subsection b. or k. of this section, as applicable, the authority, in consultation with the department, may consider additional factors that may include, but shall not be limited to: the economic feasibility of the redevelopment project; the benefit of the redevelopment project to the community in which the remediation project or residential redevelopment project is located, as applicable; the degree to which the redevelopment project enhances and promotes economic development and reduces environmental or public health stressors in an overburdened community, as those terms are defined by section 2 of P.L.2020, c.92 (C.13:1D-158), and attendant department regulations; and, if the developer has a board of directors, the extent to which that board of directors is diverse and representative of the community in which the redevelopment project is located.  The authority, in consultation with the department, shall submit applications that comply with the eligibility criteria set forth in this section, fulfill the additional factors considered by the authority pursuant to this subsection, satisfy the submission requirements, and provide adequate information for the subject application, to the board for final approval. f.     (1) The authority shall award tax credits to redevelopment projects that are remediation projects until either the available tax credits are exhausted or all such redevelopment projects that are eligible for a tax credit pursuant to the provisions of sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through C.34:1B-287) receive a tax credit, whichever occurs first.  If insufficient funding exists to allow a tax credit to a developer in accordance with the provisions of subsection a. of section 16 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-284), the authority may offer the developer a value of the tax credit below the amount provided for in subsection a. of section 16 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-284). (2) The authority shall award tax credits to redevelopment projects that are residential redevelopment projects until either the available tax credits are exhausted or all such projects that are eligible for a tax credit pursuant to the provisions of sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through C.34:1B-287), as amended by P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), receive a tax credit, whichever occurs first.  If insufficient funding exists to allow a tax credit to a developer in accordance with the provisions of subsection a. of section 16 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-284), the authority may offer the developer a value of the tax credit below the amount provided for in subsection a. of section 16 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-284). g.    A developer shall pay to the authority or to the department, as appropriate, the full amount of the direct costs of an analysis concerning the developer's application for a tax credit, which a third party retained by the authority or department performs, if the authority or department deems such retention to be necessary. h.    If the authority determines that a developer made a material misrepresentation on the developer's application, the developer shall forfeit all tax credits awarded under the program. i.     If circumstances require a developer to amend its application to the authority, then the developer, or an authorized agent of the developer, shall certify to the authority that the information provided in its amended application is true, under the penalty of perjury. j.     A developer who has commenced remediation or clean up at the site and who could not reasonably have known the full extent of the site contamination prior to commencing the remediation may still apply for a tax credit under the program, if the developer certifies to the authority, under the penalty of perjury, that the developer cannot reasonably finish the remediation and commence the redevelopment project absent the tax credit. k.    A redevelopment project that is a residential redevelopment project shall be eligible for a tax credit only if the developer demonstrates to the authority and the department at the time of application that: (1)   the redevelopment project is located on a remediated brownfield site that is within two miles of a public rail or light rail stop or within one mile of a public bus stop; (2)   the redevelopment project is primarily for multifamily housing, of which units: (a)   at least 25 percent have three bedrooms; (b)   at least 50 percent have two bedrooms; and (c)   at least 20 percent are reserved for affordable housing; (3)   the developer shall obtain and submit to the authority, before approval by the board, a letter evidencing support for the redevelopment project from the governing body of the municipality in which the residential redevelopment project is located; (4)   each worker employed to perform construction or building services work at the redevelopment project shall be paid not less than the prevailing wage rate for the worker's craft or trade, as determined by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.).  The prevailing wage requirements shall apply for construction work through the completion of the redevelopment project, and the prevailing wage requirements shall apply for building services work at the site of the redevelopment project for 10 years following completion of the redevelopment project.  In the event a redevelopment project constitutes a lease of more than 35 percent of a facility, the prevailing wage requirements shall apply to the entire facility; and (5)   any additional requirements that the authority and department may require. (cf:  P.L.2024, c.61, s.6) 4.    Section 13 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-281) is amended to read as follows: 13.  a.  Following approval of an application by the board, but prior to the start of any remediation or clean up at the site of the redevelopment project that is a remediation project or prior to the start of construction for a residential redevelopment project, except activities disclosed at the time of approval or those in accordance with section 12 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-280), the authority shall enter into a redevelopment agreement with the developer.  The chief executive officer of the authority shall negotiate the terms and conditions of the redevelopment agreement on behalf of the State. b.    The redevelopment agreement shall specify the amount of the tax credit to be awarded to the developer, the date on which the developer shall complete the remediation or construction, and the projected project remediation cost or projected project costs.  The redevelopment agreement shall require the developer to submit progress reports to the authority and to the department every six months pursuant to section 15 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-283). c.     The authority shall not enter into a redevelopment agreement with a developer unless: (1)   the redevelopment project complies with standards established by the authority in accordance with the green building manual prepared by the Commissioner of Community Affairs pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2007, c.132 (C.52:27D-130.6), regarding the use of renewable energy, energy-efficient technology, and non-renewable resources to reduce environmental degradation and encourage long-term cost reduction; (2)   the redevelopment project complies with the authority's affirmative action requirements, adopted pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1979, c.303 (C.34:1B-5.4); and (3)   the developer pays each worker employed to perform remediation work, construction work, or building services work at the redevelopment project not less than the prevailing wage rate in accordance with the requirements of paragraph (6) of subsection b. of section 12 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-280) for the worker's craft or trade, as determined by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.). d.    The authority shall not enter into a redevelopment agreement unless the developer demonstrates, to the satisfaction of the Department of Environmental Protection, that the developer did not discharge a hazardous substance at the brownfield site proposed to be in the redevelopment agreement and is not a corporate successor to the discharger, to any person in any way responsible for the hazardous substance, or to anyone liable for cleanup and removal costs pursuant to section 8 of P.L.1976, c.141 (C.58:10-23.11g). e.     (1)  Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the authority shall not enter into a redevelopment agreement for a redevelopment project that includes at least one retail establishment that will have more than 10 employees or at least one distribution center that will have more than 20 employees, unless the redevelopment agreement includes a precondition that any business that serves as the owner or operator of the retail establishment or distribution center enters into a labor harmony agreement with a labor organization or cooperating labor organizations which represent retail or distribution center employees in the State. (2)   A labor harmony agreement shall be required only if the State has a proprietary interest in the redevelopment project and shall remain in effect for as long as the State acts as a market participant in the redevelopment project.  The authority may enter into a redevelopment agreement with a developer without the labor harmony agreement required under paragraph (1) of this subsection only if the authority determines that the redevelopment project would not be feasible if a labor harmony agreement is required.  The authority shall support the determination by a written finding, which provides the specific basis for the determination. (3)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2024, c.61) f.     The redevelopment agreement shall provide that issuance of a tax credit under the program shall be conditioned upon the subrogation to the department of all rights of the developer to recover remediation costs from any other person who discharges a hazardous substance or is in any way responsible, pursuant to section 8 of P.L.1976, c.141 (C.58:10-23.11g), for a hazardous substance that was discharged at the brownfield site. g.    A developer may seek a revision to the redevelopment agreement if the developer cannot complete the remediation or construction on or before the date set forth in the redevelopment agreement.  A developer's ability to change the date on which the developer shall complete the remediation or construction shall be subject to the availability of tax credits in the year of the revised date of completion. h.    [A] (1)  For a redevelopment project that is a remediation project, a developer shall submit to the authority satisfactory evidence of the actual remediation costs, as certified by a certified public accountant, and a licensed site remediation professional for costs under the jurisdiction of the "Site Remediation Reform Act," sections 1 through 29 of P.L.2009, c.60 (C.58:10C-1 et seq.), and as applicable, other appropriate licensed or certified professional for costs that are not under the jurisdiction of the "Site Remediation Reform Act," evidence of completion of the remediation as demonstrated by a Response Action Outcome where the remediation is subject to the "Site Remediation Reform Act," a certification from the appropriate licensed or certified professional for other remedial activities, and a certification that all information provided by the developer to the authority is true, including information contained in the application, the redevelopment agreement, any amendment to the redevelopment agreement, and any other information submitted by the developer to the authority pursuant to sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through C.34:1B-287).  The developer, or an authorized agent of the developer, shall certify under the penalty of perjury that the information provided pursuant to this subsection is true. (2)   For a redevelopment project that is a residential redevelopment project, a developer shall submit to the authority satisfactory evidence of the actual project costs, as certified by a certified public accountant, evidence of a temporary certificate of occupancy, or other event evidencing project completion, and a certification that all information provided by the developer to the authority is true, including information contained in the application, the redevelopment agreement, any amendment to the redevelopment agreement, and any other information submitted by the developer to the authority pursuant to sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through C.34:1B-287).  The developer, or an authorized agent of the developer, shall certify under the penalty of perjury that the information provided pursuant to this subsection is true. i.     The redevelopment agreement shall include a provision allowing the authority to recapture the tax credits for any year in which the Department of Environmental Protection, the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, or the Department of the Treasury that advises the authority that the developer is not in substantial good standing with the respective department, nor has the developer entered into an agreement with the respective department that includes a practical corrective action plan for the developer.  The redevelopment agreement shall also include a provision allowing the authority to recapture the tax credits for any year in which the developer fails to confirm that each contractor or subcontractor performing work at the redevelopment project: (1) is registered as required by "The Public Works Contractor Registration Act," P.L.1999, c.238 (C.34:11-56.48 et seq.); (2) has not been debarred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development from engaging in or bidding on Public Works Contracts in New Jersey; and (3) possesses a tax clearance certificate issued by the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury. (cf:  P.L.2024, c.61, s.7) 5.    Section 15 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-283) is amended to read as follows: 15.  Commencing with the date six months following the date the authority and a developer execute a redevelopment agreement and every six months thereafter until completion of the project, the developer shall submit an update of the status of the redevelopment project to the authority and to the department, including the remediation costs incurred by the developer for the remediation of the contaminated property located at the site of the redevelopment project that is a remediation project or the project costs incurred by the developer for the construction of a residential redevelopment project.  Unless the authority determines that extenuating circumstances exist, the authority's approval of a tax credit shall expire if the authority, the department, or both, do not timely receive the status update required under this section.  The authority may rescind an award of tax credits under the program if a redevelopment project fails to advance in accordance with the redevelopment agreement. (cf:  P.L.2020, c.156, s.15) 6.    Section 16 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-284) is amended to read as follows: 16.  a.  Upon completion of the remediation of a remediation project or the construction of a residential redevelopment project, the developer shall seek certification from the authority, in consultation with the department, that: (1)   the remediation or construction is complete; (2)   the developer complied with the requirements of section 14 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-282), as applicable, and section 15 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-283); and (3)   the remediation costs or project costs were actually and reasonably incurred. Upon receipt of certification, and confirmation by the authority that the developer's obligations under the redevelopment agreement have been met, a developer shall be awarded a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), sections 2 and 3 of P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-2 and C.54:18A-3), section 1 of P.L.1950, c.231 (C.17:32-15), or N.J.S.17B:23-5 as follows: (a) for a remediation project located in a qualified incentive tract or government-restricted municipality, in an amount not to exceed 80 percent of the actual remediation costs, 80 percent of the projected remediation costs as set forth in the redevelopment agreement, or $12,000,000, whichever is least; (b) for a remediation project erecting a solar panel array on the site of a closed sanitary landfill, in an amount not to exceed 100 percent of the costs of remediation and capping of the landfill, $12,000,000 if the project is located in a qualified incentive tract or government-restricted municipality, or $8,000,000 if the project is located anywhere else in the State, whichever is least; [and] (c) for all other remediation projects, in an amount not to exceed 60 percent of the actual remediation costs, 60 percent of the projected remediation costs as set forth in the redevelopment agreement, or $8,000,000, whichever is least; (d) for a residential redevelopment project located in a qualified incentive tract or government-restricted municipality, in an amount not to exceed 100 percent of the actual project costs, 100 percent of the projected project costs as set forth in the redevelopment agreement, or $6,000,000, whichever is least; and (e) for all other residential redevelopment projects, in an amount not to exceed 60 percent of the actual project costs, 60 percent of the projected project costs as set forth in the redevelopment agreement, or $8,000,000, whichever is least. The developer, or an authorized agent of the developer, shall certify that the information provided to the department and the authority pursuant to this subsection is true under the penalty of perjury. b.    When filing an application for certification pursuant to subsection a. of this section, the developer shall submit to the department and the authority: (1) for a remediation project, the total remediation costs incurred by the developer for the remediation of the subject property located at the site of the redevelopment project, as provided in the redevelopment agreement and certified by a certified public accountant, a licensed site remediation professional for costs under the jurisdiction of the "Site Remediation Reform Act," sections 1 through 29 of P.L.2009, c.60 (C.58:10C-1 et seq.), and, as applicable, other appropriate licensed or certified professional for costs that are not under the jurisdiction of the "Site Remediation Reform Act"; (2) for a remediation project, evidence of completion of the remediation, as demonstrated by a Response Action Outcome where the remediation is subject to the "Site Remediation Reform Act"; (3) for a remediation project, a certification from the appropriate licensed or certified professional for other remedial activities; (4) as applicable, information concerning the occupancy rate of any buildings or other work areas located on the property subject to the redevelopment agreement; and (5) such other information as the department deems necessary in order to make the certifications and findings pursuant to this section, including such other information as the department deems necessary in order to certify completion of a residential redevelopment project. c.     A developer shall apply the credit awarded against the developer's liability for the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), sections 2 and 3 of P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-2 and C.54:18A-3), section 1 of P.L.1950, c.231 (C.17:32-15), or N.J.S.17B:23-5 for the privilege period during which the director awards the developer a tax credit pursuant to subsection a. of this section.  A developer shall not carry forward any unused credit. d.    The director shall prescribe the order of priority of the application of the credit awarded under this section and any other credits allowed by law against the tax imposed under section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5).  The amount of the credit applied under this section against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) for a privilege period, together with any other credits allowed by law, shall not reduce the tax liability to an amount less than the statutory minimum provided in subsection (e) of section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5). (cf:  P.L.2024, c.61, s.9) 7.    Section 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-287) is amended to read as follows: 19.  a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to the contrary, the chief executive officer of the authority, in consultation with the Commissioner of Environmental Protection, may adopt, immediately upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law, regulations that the chief executive officer and commissioner deem necessary to implement the provisions of sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through C.34:1B-287), which regulations shall be effective for a period not to exceed 360 days from the date of the filing.  The chief executive officer, in consultation with the Commissioner of Environmental Protection, shall thereafter amend, adopt, or readopt the regulations in accordance with the requirements of P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.).  The rules shall require annual reporting by developers that receive tax credits pursuant to the program, in addition to the regular progress updates.  As part of the authority's review of the annual reports required from a developer, the authority shall confirm with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, the Department of Environmental Protection, and the Department of the Treasury that the developer is in substantial good standing with the respective department, or has entered into an agreement with the respective department that includes a practical corrective action plan, and the developer shall certify that any contractors or subcontractors performing work at the redevelopment project: (1) are registered as required by "The Public Works Contractor Registration Act," P.L.1999, c.238 (C.34:11-56.48 et seq.); (2) have not been debarred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development from engaging in or bidding on Public Works Contracts in New Jersey; and (3) possess a tax clearance certificate issued by the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury.  The rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall also include a provision to require that, in any year in which the developer is not in substantial good standing with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, the Department of Environmental Protection, or the Department of the Treasury, the developer may forfeit all tax credits awarded in that year, and to allow the authority to extend, in individual cases, the deadline for any annual reporting requirement established pursuant to this section. b.    Notwithstanding any provision of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to the contrary, the chief executive officer of the authority may adopt, immediately upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law, rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of P.L.2024, c.61.  The rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall be effective for a period not to exceed 365 days following the date of filing and may thereafter be amended, adopted, or readopted by the director in accordance with the requirements of P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). c.     Notwithstanding any provision of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to the contrary, the chief executive officer of the authority may adopt, immediately upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law, rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of P.L.    , c.     (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  The rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this subsection shall be effective for a period not to exceed 365 days following the date of filing and may thereafter be amended, adopted, or readopted by the chief executive officer in accordance with the requirements of P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). (cf:  P.L.2024, c.61, s.10) 8.    Section 98 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-362) is amended to read as follows: 98.  a.  The combined value of all tax credits awarded under the "Historic Property Reinvestment Act," sections 2 through 8 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-270 through 34:1B-276); the "Brownfields Redevelopment Incentive Program Act," sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through 34:1B-287); the "New Jersey Innovation Evergreen Act," sections 20 through 34 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-288 through 34:1B-302); the "Food Desert Relief Act," sections 35 through 42 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-303 through 34:1B-310); the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335); the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.); section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4); the "Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act," P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.); the "Next New Jersey Program Act," P.L.2024, c.49 (C.34:1B-394 et al.); P.L.2025, c.111 (C.55:14K-106 et al.); and the "Next New Jersey Manufacturing Program Act," P.L.2025, c.123 (C.34:1B-403 et al.) shall not exceed an overall cap of [$11.5] $11.65 billion over a nine-year period, subject to the conditions and limitations set forth in this section.  Of this [$11.5] $11.65 billion, $2.5 billion shall be reserved for transformative projects approved under the Aspire Program. b.    (1)  The total value of tax credits awarded under any constituent program of the "New Jersey Economic Recovery Act of 2020," P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.); the "Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act," P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.); the "Next New Jersey Program Act," P.L.2024, c.49 (C.34:1B-394 et al.), P.L.2025, c.111 (C.55:14K-106 et al.); and the Next New Jersey Manufacturing Program Act, P.L.2025, c.123 (34:1B-403 et al.) shall be subject to the following limitations, except as otherwise provided in subsection c. of this section: (a)   for tax credits awarded under the "Historic Property Reinvestment Act," sections 2 through 8 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-270 through 34:1B-276), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $50 million; (b)   (i)  for tax credits awarded under the "Brownfields Redevelopment Incentive Program Act," sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through 34:1B-287), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $50 million and the total value of tax credits awarded over the entirety of the nine-year period shall not exceed [$100,000,000] $250,000,000, of which not more than $150,000,000 in tax credits shall be awarded to the developers of residential redevelopment projects; (ii)   from the tax credits made available to the "Brownfields Redevelopment Incentive Program Act," sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through 34:1B-287), the sum of $200,000,000 in tax credits shall be allocated to the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency, established pursuant to P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-1 et seq.), which tax credits shall be sold through competitive auctions conducted pursuant to sections 3 through 7 of P.L.2025, c.111 (C.55:14K-106 through 55:14K-110).  All proceeds of the tax credit auctions shall be used by the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency for the purposes authorized in subsection b. of section 4 of P.L.2025, c.111 (C.55:14K-107).  Notwithstanding any provision of law or regulation to the contrary, the tax credits reallocated to the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency shall not be subject to any requirements or conditions of the "New Jersey Economic Recovery Act of 2020," P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.), as amended or supplemented; (c)   for tax credits awarded under the "New Jersey Innovation Evergreen Act," sections 20 through 34 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-288 through 34:1B-302), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $60 million and the total value of tax credits awarded over the entirety of the nine-year period shall not exceed $300,000,000; (d)   for tax credits awarded under the "Food Desert Relief Act," sections 35 through 42 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-303 through 34:1B-310), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $40 million; (e)   for tax credits awarded under the  "Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act," P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.), the total value of tax credits awarded during the nine-year period shall not exceed $1,200,000,000; (f)   for tax credits awarded under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $1.1 billion.  If the authority awards tax credits in an amount less than the annual limitation, then the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation shall be made available for qualified offshore wind projects awarded under section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4), pursuant to subparagraph (h) of this paragraph, projects awarded a tax credit pursuant to the "Next New Jersey Program Act," P.L.2024, c.49 (C.34:1B-394 et al.), pursuant to subparagraph (k) of this paragraph, projects awarded a tax credit pursuant to the Next New Jersey Manufacturing Program Act, P.L.2025, c.123 (C.34:1B-403 et al.), pursuant to subparagraph (l) of this paragraph, cultural arts institutions awarded a tax credit pursuant to the Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act, P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.), pursuant to subparagraph (l) of this paragraph, or New Jersey studio partners, New Jersey film-lease production companies, and taxpayers, other than New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies awarded under sections 1 and 2 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b and C.54A:4-12b), pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and subsection d. of this section. During each of the first six years of the nine-year period, the authority shall annually award tax credits valuing no greater than $715 million for projects located in the northern counties of the State, and the authority shall annually award tax credits valuing no greater than $385 million for projects located in the southern counties of the State under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.).  If during any of the first six years of the nine-year period, the authority awards tax credits under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), in an amount less than the annual limitation for projects located in northern counties or southern counties, as applicable, the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation shall be available to be deployed by the authority in a subsequent year, provided that the uncommitted portion of tax credits shall be awarded for projects located in the applicable geographic area, except that (i) after the completion of the third year of the nine-year period, the authority may deploy 50 percent of the uncommitted portion of tax credits for any previous year without consideration to the county in which a project is located; and (ii) after the completion of the sixth year of the nine-year period, the authority may deploy all available tax credits, including the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation for any previous year, without consideration to the county in which a project is located; (g)   except as provided in subparagraph (j) of this paragraph, for tax credits awarded for transformative projects under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), the total value of tax credits awarded during the nine-year period shall not exceed $2.5 billion. The total value of tax credits awarded for transformative projects in a given year shall not be subject to an annual limitation, except that the total value of tax credits awarded to any transformative project shall not exceed $400 million; (h)   from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, an amount not to exceed $350,000,000 shall be made available for qualified offshore wind projects awarded a credit pursuant to section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4) during the first three years of the nine-year period; (i)    beginning in fiscal year 2023, from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, additional amounts shall be made available for New Jersey studio partners, New Jersey film-lease production companies, and taxpayers, other than New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies pursuant to sections 1 and 2 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b and C.54A:4-12b); (j)    beginning in fiscal year 2024, from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335) and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, an amount not to exceed $500,000,000 may be annually transferred for the award to transformative projects under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), provided that: (i) the remaining allocation of tax credits otherwise available for transformative projects, pursuant to subparagraph (g) of this paragraph, is less than $1,000,000,000; and (ii) the authority board determines that the transfer of tax credits is warranted based on such criteria as the authority deems appropriate, which may include the criteria set forth in paragraph (2) of this subsection.  If a transfer of tax credits is made pursuant to this subparagraph, the authority shall award no greater than 65 percent of the tax credits transferred pursuant to this subparagraph to transformative projects located in the northern counties of the State and no greater than 35 percent of the tax credits transferred pursuant to this subparagraph to transformative projects located in the southern counties of the State; (k)   beginning in fiscal year 2025, from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335) and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), but not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, an amount not to exceed $500,000,000 shall be made available for projects awarded a tax credit pursuant to the "Next New Jersey Program Act," P.L.2024, c.49 (C.34:1B-394 et al.); (l)    once the tax credits allocated for competitive auctions conducted pursuant to sections 3 through 7 of P.L.2025, c.111 (C.55:14K-106 through 55:14K-110) pursuant to subsubparagraph (ii) of subparagraph (b) of this paragraph are exhausted, from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335) and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), but not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, the sum of $300,000,000 shall be made available to the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency, established pursuant to P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-1 et seq.), which tax credits shall be sold through  competitive auctions conducted pursuant to sections 3 through 7 of P.L.2025, c.111 (C.55:14K-106 through 55:14K-110).  The amount made available pursuant to this subparagraph shall be allocated in annual installments, each of which is not to exceed the cap set forth in paragraph (3) of subsection a. of section 4 of P.L.2025, c.111 (C.55:14K-107), as needed to conduct auctions pursuant to that section.  All proceeds of the tax credit auctions shall be used by the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency for the purposes authorized in subsection b. of section 4 of P.L.2025, c.111 (C.55:14K-107).  Notwithstanding any provision of law or regulation to the contrary, the tax credits reallocated to the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency shall not be subject to any requirements or conditions of the "New Jersey Economic Recovery Act of 2020," P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.), as amended or supplemented; and (m)  beginning in fiscal year 2026, from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335) and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), but not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, an amount not to exceed $500,000,000 shall be made available for projects awarded a tax credit pursuant to the Next New Jersey Manufacturing Program Act, P.L.2025, c.123 (C.34:1B-403 et al.) and an amount not to exceed $500,000,000 shall be made available for cultural arts institutions awarded a tax credit pursuant to the Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act, P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.). In accordance with the provisions of subsection g. of section 5 of P.L.2025, c.123 (C.34:1B-407), $100,000,000 of the tax credits made available to the Next New Jersey Manufacturing Program Act, P.L.2025, c.123 (C.34:1B-403 et al.) pursuant to this subparagraph shall be reserved exclusively for eligible businesses that are clean energy product manufacturers. (2)   The authority may in any given year determine that it is in the State's interest to approve an amount of tax credits in excess of the annual limitations set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection, but in no event more than $200,000,000 in excess of the annual limitation, upon a determination by the authority board that such increase is warranted based on specific criteria that may include: (i)    the increased demand for opportunities to create or retain employment and investment in the State as indicated by the volume of project applications and the amount of tax credits being sought by those applications; (ii)   the need to protect the State's economic position in the event of an economic downturn; (iii) the quality of project applications and the net economic benefit to the State and municipalities associated with those applications; (iv)  opportunities for project applications to strengthen or protect the competitiveness of the State under the prevailing market conditions; (v)   enhanced access to employment and investment for underserved populations in distressed municipalities and qualified incentives tracts; (vi)  increased investment and employment in high-growth technology sectors and in projects that entail collaboration with education institutions in the State; (vii)  increased development proximate to mass transit facilities; (viii)  any other factor deemed relevant by the authority. c.     In the event that the authority in any year approves projects for tax credits in an amount less than the annual limitations set forth in paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section, then the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation shall be available to be deployed by the authority in future years for projects under the same program, provided however, that in no event shall the aggregate amount of tax credits approved be in excess of the overall cap of [$11.5] $11.65 billion, and in no event shall the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation for any previous year be deployed after the conclusion of the nine-year period. d.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the uncommitted balance of the total value of tax credits authorized for award by the authority pursuant to subparagraph (f) of paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 et seq.), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), shall be made available for tax credits allowed to New Jersey studio partners, New Jersey film-lease production companies, and taxpayers, other than New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies pursuant to sections 1 and 2 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b and C.54A:4-12b).  The value of tax credits, including tax credits allowed through the granting of tax credit transfer certificates, made available to New Jersey studio partners, New Jersey film-lease production companies, and taxpayers, other than New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies pursuant to this subsection shall be as follows: (1)   in fiscal year 2023, $250,000,000 for New Jersey studio partners and $250,000,000 for New Jersey film-lease production companies; (2)   in fiscal year 2024, $250,000,000 for New Jersey studio partners and $250,000,000 for New Jersey film-lease production companies; and (3)   in fiscal year 2025, $250,000,000 for New Jersey studio partners, $250,000,000 for New Jersey film-lease production companies, and $300,000,000 for taxpayers, other than New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies. If the value of tax credits, including tax credits allowed through the granting of tax credit transfer certificates, approved to New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies in any fiscal year pursuant to this subsection is less than the cumulative total amount of tax credits permitted to be approved in that fiscal year, the authority shall certify the amount of the remaining tax credits available for approval to each such category in that fiscal year and shall increase the cumulative total amount of tax credits permitted to be approved for New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies in the subsequent fiscal year by the certified amount remaining for each such category from the prior fiscal year. (cf:  P.L.2025, c.127, s.10) 9.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to any applications submitted for a redevelopment project following the effective date of this act.